Maryland, session 2025, SB0247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
4–211.
(d) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Covered building” has the meaning stated in § 2–1601 of the
Environment Article.
(iii) “Energy conservation project” means a project that qualifies
under § 4–218 of this subtitle.
(2) For the purpose of reducing direct greenhouse gas emissions from
multifamily residential buildings in accordance with the standards adopted under § 2–1602
of the Environment Article, the Administration shall develop and implement a program to
provide grants AND LOANS for energy conservation projects and projects to install
renewable energy generating systems in covered buildings that house primarily low– to
moderate–income households.
(3) Grants AND LOANS provided under this subsection may not be used for
a project to install new equipment that uses fossil fuels or improve the efficiency of existing
equipment that uses fossil fuels.
(4) In each of fiscal years 2024 through 2026, the Governor shall include in
the annual budget bill an appropriation of $5,000,000 to the Department for the purpose of
providing grants AND LOANS under this subsection.
(5) On or before December 1, 2023, and each December 1 thereafter, the
Administration shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly on the projects funded under this subsection.
Article – Public Utilities
7–224.
(a) (1) Beginning January 1, 2025, and on or before January 1 every 3 years,
starting in 2027, the Department shall procure or provide to low–income individuals energy
efficiency and conservation programs and services, demand response programs and
services, and beneficial electrification programs and services that achieve the greenhouse
gas emissions reduction targets established for the Department under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.

SENATE BILL 247 3
(2) For the period 2025–2033, the programs and services required under
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be on a trajectory to achieve greenhouse gas
reductions after 2027 of at least 0.9% of the baseline determined under subsection (b) of
this section.
(3) (i) When establishing greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets
under this subsection, the Commission shall measure the greenhouse gas emissions from
electricity using current data and projections from the Department of the Environment.
(ii) The greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets established
under this subsection shall be measured in metric tons.
(4) The greenhouse gas reductions achieved to meet the targets established
under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall count toward the achievement of the
greenhouse gas reduction target established under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle.
(5) The target greenhouse gas savings shall be achieved based on the
3–year average of the Department’s plan submitted in accordance with subsection (d) of
this section.
(6) For 2025 and 2026:
(i) the Commission shall, after making appropriate findings,
determine whether the Department’s existing 2024–2026 plan must be modified to comply
with:
1. the targets established in this subsection; and
2. § 7–225(d) of this subtitle; and
(ii) the Department:
1. shall provide information as required by the Commission
to assist in making the determination in item (i) of this paragraph; and
2. is only required to file new plans in accordance with
subsection (d) of this section and § 7–225 of this subtitle if directed by the Commission.
(b) As a baseline for determining greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets
under this section, the Commission shall use the greenhouse gas emissions resulting from
the direct consumption of gas and electricity by low–income residential households in 2016,
as determined by the Department of the Environment.
(c) [(1) The] WHEN CALCULATING THE ACHIEVEMENT OF GREENHOUSE
GAS EMISSIONS REDUCTION TARGETS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE Department may
[procure or provide] INCLUDE savings that are achieved through [funding sources that
meet the standards of program funding through utility rates or the U.S. Department of

SENATE BILL 247
Energy] ALL FUNDING SOURCES, TO THE EXTENT THAT THE SAVINGS FROM THOSE
FUNDING SOURCES ARE ACHIEVED:
(1) IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH REQUIREMENTS OF THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY; OR
(2) IN A MANNER OTHERWISE CONSISTENT WITH THE ENERGY
SAVINGS REQUIREMENTS APPLICABLE TO THOSE FUNDING SOURCES.
[(2) The Department may use the savings achieved through all funding
sources toward calculating the targeted greenhouse gas reductions if the funding sources
meet the standards of programs funded through:
(i) a surcharge under § 7–222 of this subtitle; or
(ii) the U.S. Department of Energy.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.